Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201118-1740
Handicapped or
disabled persons; parking permits;
period valid; renewal.

(1) This section applies until the implementation date designated
by the Director of Motor Vehicles under section 60-3,113.01.

(2) Permanently issued handicapped or disabled parking permits issued prior to October 1, 2011, shall be
valid for a period ending on the last day of the month of the applicant's
birthday in the third year after issuance and shall expire on that day. Permanently issued handicapped or disabled
parking permits issued on or after October 1, 2011, shall be valid for a period
ending on the last day of the month of the applicant's birthday in the sixth
year after issuance and shall expire on that day.

(3) All handicapped or disabled parking permits for
temporarily handicapped or disabled persons shall be issued for
a period ending not more than six months after the date of issuance but may
be renewed one time for a period not to exceed six months. For the renewal
period, there shall be submitted an additional application with proof of a
handicap or disability.

Laws 1977, LB 13, § 5;

Laws 1979, LB 146, § 5;

Laws 1980, LB 717, § 7;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 5;

Laws 1987, LB 598, § 6;

Laws 1988, LB 833, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 928, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 632, § 12;

Laws 1995, LB 593, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1211, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 31, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 809, § 7;

Laws 2005, LB 406, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB163, § 7.